Illinois, session 104th, HB3726.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Expanded Access to Lung Cancer Screening Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.8    "Nicotine replacement therapy" means a treatment that 9helps people quit smoking by providing a lower dose of 10nicotine without the harmful chemicals in cigarettes. 11"Nicotine replacement therapy" includes a patch, gum, lozenge, 12spray, or inhaler that releases nicotine into the body.13    "Retailer of tobacco products" has the meaning given to 14the term "retailer" in Section 10-5 of the Tobacco Products 15Tax Act of 1995.16    "Retailer of nicotine replacement therapies" means a 17person engaged in the business of selling nicotine replacement 18therapies to consumers.19    "Tobacco quitline" means a resource that is free to 20tobacco users in Illinois who want to quit using tobacco, that 21is accessible by a toll-free telephone number, and that is 22established, operated, and funded with the assistance of the 23Department. "Tobacco quitline" includes an evidence-based   HB3726- 2 -LRB104 07441 BDA 17482 b1program, certified counselors, and staff to provide the 2support needed for tobacco users in Illinois to break the 3habit of using tobacco. 4    Section 10. Lung cancer screening counseling. The 5Department shall require information and counseling concerning 6lung cancer screening to be made available to individuals 7through the tobacco quitline. The Department may enter into 8contracts and agreements with persons operating the tobacco 9quitline on behalf of the Department and may award grants for 10the purposes of this Act. In the course of providing 11information and counseling concerning lung cancer screening, 12the Department and the operators of the tobacco quitline 13shall:14        (1) rely upon the criteria and guidelines developed by 15    the United States Preventive Service Task Force for lung 16    cancer screening;17        (2) provide information about, and direct eligible 18    individuals to, lung cancer screening services; and19        (3) participate in quality improvement activities, 20    including reporting data to the Department on the number 21    of callers referred to lung cancer screening. 22    Section 15. Education about lung cancer screening.23    (a) The Department shall develop signage that discloses 24referral information for lung cancer screening. The signage   HB3726- 3 -LRB104 07441 BDA 17482 b1shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: 2        (1) information about who is eligible for lung cancer 3    screening; and 4        (2) contact information for the tobacco quitline, 5    including the toll-free telephone number. 6    The Department shall make available this signage to 7retailers of tobacco products and retailers of nicotine 8replacement therapies. Retailers of tobacco products and 9retailers of nicotine replacement therapies shall 10conspicuously post this signage in their retail 11establishments.12    (b) The Department shall develop an educational insert to 13accompany the sale of tobacco products and nicotine 14replacement therapies. This educational insert shall include, 15but shall not be limited to, the following:16        (1) information on the effectiveness of lung cancer 17    screening;18        (2) information on the eligibility criteria for lung 19    cancer screening under the United States Preventive 20    Service Task Force guidelines; and21        (3) contact information for the tobacco quitline, 22    including the toll-free telephone number. 23    The Department shall make available this educational 24insert to retailers of tobacco products and retailers of 25nicotine replacement therapies. Retailers of tobacco products 26and retailers of nicotine replacement therapies shall provide   HB3726- 4 -LRB104 07441 BDA 17482 b1a copy of the educational insert provided by the Department to 2every person purchasing a tobacco product or nicotine 3replacement therapy at the point of sale.4    (c) A retailer of tobacco products or a retailer of 5nicotine replacement therapies who intentionally violates any 6provision of this Section is guilty of a petty offense. 7    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 8implementing this Act.